Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-403
Railroads; violation of orders of commission; civil liability; defenses precluded.

Any railroad carrier shall be liable for any damage or injury that shall be caused or contributed to by a violation of any commission order, issued after due notice and hearing, relating to the efficiency, sufficiency, and safety of the service, facilities, or equipment furnished by such carrier. In such case, the railroad carrier shall not be entitled to the defenses of assumption of risk or contributory negligence.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. IV, § 3, p. 1399;

Laws 1965, c. 446, § 5, p. 1418.